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DTC C1731 / 31 toC 1736 /36 ControlValveSolenoidand
Accumulator Solenoid Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The control valve assembly consists of each front and rear leveling valve and gate valve and performs the
height control and connecting and disconnecting the fluid line of the right and left shock absorber by operat-
ing the solenoid valve ON and OFF with the control signal from the ECU.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1731 / 31
C1733 /33

Wheneitherof the followingconditionconsisted4 times
continuously:
1.When thecondition that theB terminal voltageofECUis

SFront, reargatevalvesolenoid
SFront, reargatevalvesolenoidcircuit
SSuspensioncontrolECU

C1732 /32
C1734 /34

g
more than 10 ± 0.5Vand the lower reachesvoltageof the
solenoidwhile it is innon −operationcondition is less than
20%of theB terminal voltagecontinued for20 ± 5msec.

2 When the condition that the B terminal voltage of ECU is

SFront, rear levelingvalvesolenoid
SFront, rear levelingvalvesolenoidcircuit
SSuspensioncontrolECU

C1736 /36

2. When thecon dition that the B terminal voltageo fECU is
more than 10 ± 0.5Vand the lower reachesvoltageof the
solenoidwhile it is inoperationcondition ismore than80%
of theB terminal voltagecontinued for20 ± 5msec.

SAccumulatorsolenoid
SAccumulatorsolenoidcircuit

SSuspensioncontrolECU

HINT:
S CodeC 1731 / 31 corresponds to the frontgatevalvesolenoidcircuit.
S CodeC 1732 /32corresponds to the front levelingvalvesolenoidcircuit.
S CodeC 1733 /33corresponds to the reargatevalvesolenoidcircuit.
S CodeC 1734 /34corresponds to the rear levelingvalvesolenoidcircuit.
S CodeC 1736 /36corresponds to theaccumulatorsolenoidcircuit.

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the control valve assembly circuit, the ECU prohibits the height control and fixed the
damping force at the sports mode.
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WIRING DIAGRAM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkcontrolvalveassemblyandaccumulatorsolenoidoperation.

INCASEOFUSINGHAND −HELDTESTER:
PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Start theengineandpush thehand −held testermainswitchON.
(c)Select theACTIVETESTmodeon thehand −held tester.
CHECK:
Check that the operation sound of solenoid or vibration of the control valve assembly and height control ac-
cumulatorwhenoperating thesolenoidwith thehand −held tester.
OK:

The operation sound of the solenoid be heard or the vibration of the control valve assembly or
height control accumulator should be felt.
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IN CASE OF NOT USING HAND−HELD TESTER:
PREPARATION:
(a) Using SST, connect the terminal Ts to CG of DLC3.

SST 09843−1 8040

(b) Push the ”DOWN” button of the height select switch 5
times or more within 5 seconds after starting the engine.

HINT:
At this time the height control OFF indicator light flashes at 0.25
second intervals.
CHECK:
Perform each solenoid inspection by the switches of the follow-
ing table, then check that the operation sound of the solenoid
or the vibration of the control valve assembly or height control
accumulator.

Damping mode select switch Height control switch Height select switch

Front leveling solenoid ”SPORT 1” mode − Push ”UP” button

Rear leveling solenoid ”SPORT 1” mode − Push ”DOWN” button

Front gate solenoid ”SPORT 1” mode Push and hold Push ”UP” button

Rear gate solenoid ”SPORT 1” mode Push and hold Push ”DOWN” button

Accumulator solenoid ”NORMAL” mode − Push ”UP” button

OK:
The operation sound of the solenoid should be heard
or the vibration of the control valve assembly or
height control accumulator should be felt.

OK Clear the DTC (See page DI−208).

NG
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2 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between control
valve assembly or accumulator solenoid and suspension control ECU (See page
IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

3 Check control valve solenoid and accumulator solenoid.

CONTROL VALVE SOLENOID
PREPARATION:
Disconnect the control valve assembly connector.
CHECK:
Check continuity between terminals 2 and 1, 3, 4, 5 of the con-
trol valve assembly connector.
OK:

Continuity

ACCUMULATOR SOLENOID
PREPARATION:
Disconnect the accumulator solenoid connector from the height
control accumulator.
CHECK:
Check continuity between terminals 1 and 2 of the accumulator
solenoid connector.
OK:

Continuity

NG Replace control valve assembly or accumulator
solenoid.

OK

Clear the DTC (See page DI−208).


